hunspell-en-ru/src/wiki_ru_RU.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1544 Y 1
SFX 1544 0 альные .
SFX 1123 Y 1
SFX 1123 0 альный .
SFX 1543 Y 1
SFX 1543 0 альным .
SFX 2663 Y 1
SFX 2663 0 ёшься .
SFX 441 Y 1
SFX 441 0 ваешь .
SFX 2923 Y 1
SFX 2923 0 ваты .
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 0 вать .
SFX 2221 Y 1
SFX 2221 0 тельница .
SFX 2348 Y 1
SFX 2348 0 тельнице .
SFX 2570 Y 1
SFX 2570 0 зов .
SFX 2874 Y 1
SFX 2874 0 зом .
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 0 хся .
SFX 1378 Y 1
SFX 1378 0 нова .
SFX 1424 Y 1
SFX 1424 0 нове .
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 щих .
SFX 1494 Y 1
SFX 1494 0 щиц .
SFX 2712 Y 1
SFX 2712 0 ющееся .
SFX 2638 Y 1
SFX 2638 0 вкою .
SFX 2175 Y 1
SFX 2175 0 чное .
SFX 2180 Y 1
SFX 2180 0 чной .
SFX 2173 Y 1
SFX 2173 0 чном .
SFX 2130 Y 1
SFX 2130 0 льницам .
SFX 1493 Y 1
SFX 1493 0 щицам .
SFX 1133 Y 1
SFX 1133 0 ающую .
SFX 782 Y 1
SFX 782 0 иными .
SFX 904 Y 1
SFX 904 0 вшимися .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 а .
SFX 2110 Y 1
SFX 2110 0 б .
SFX 58 Y 1
SFX 58 0 в .
SFX 1330 Y 1
SFX 1330 0 г .
SFX 1151 Y 1
SFX 1151 0 д .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 е .
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 0 ж .
SFX 1226 Y 1
SFX 1226 0 з .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 и .
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 0 й .
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 к .
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 0 л .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 м .
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 0 н .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 о .
SFX 2499 Y 1
SFX 2499 0 п .
SFX 952 Y 1
SFX 952 0 шками .
SFX 2452 Y 1
SFX 2452 0 ищем .
SFX 854 Y 1
SFX 854 0 изму .
SFX 896 Y 1
SFX 896 0 измы .
SFX 415 Y 1
SFX 415 0 ического .
SFX 2422 Y 1
SFX 2422 0 кав .
SFX 2279 Y 1
SFX 2279 0 кай .
SFX 2278 Y 1
SFX 2278 0 кал .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 0 кам .
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 0 овою .
SFX 1110 Y 1
SFX 1110 0 лу .
SFX 1113 Y 1
SFX 1113 0 лы .
SFX 651 Y 1
SFX 651 0 ль .
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 0 лю .
SFX 749 Y 1
SFX 749 0 ля .
SFX 500 Y 1
SFX 500 0 рах .
SFX 921 Y 1
SFX 921 0 ьные .
SFX 643 Y 1
SFX 643 0 ьный .
SFX 920 Y 1
SFX 920 0 ьным .
SFX 1269 Y 1
SFX 1269 0 кову .
SFX 1206 Y 1
SFX 1206 0 ковы .
SFX 2911 Y 1
SFX 2911 0 рованием .
SFX 2080 Y 1
SFX 2080 0 тках .
SFX 2707 Y 1
SFX 2707 0 ющиеся .
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 0 вшуюся .
SFX 307 Y 1
SFX 307 0 анием .
SFX 1813 Y 1
SFX 1813 0 цею .
SFX 1812 Y 1
SFX 1812 0 ицу .
SFX 1847 Y 1
SFX 1847 0 ицы .
SFX 2096 Y 1
SFX 2096 0 ичного .
SFX 2004 Y 1
SFX 2004 0 евшему .
SFX 2990 Y 1
SFX 2990 0 енькой .
SFX 1101 Y 1
SFX 1101 0 ировалась .
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 0 кала .
SFX 2377 Y 1
SFX 2377 0 кали .
SFX 2506 Y 1
SFX 2506 0 кало .
SFX 1270 Y 1
SFX 1270 0 кину .
SFX 1284 Y 1
SFX 1284 0 кины .
SFX 2124 Y 1
SFX 2124 0 льницу .
SFX 2123 Y 1
SFX 2123 0 льницы .
SFX 540 Y 1
SFX 540 0 иков .
SFX 1363 Y 1
SFX 1363 0 икой .
SFX 571 Y 1
SFX 571 0 иком .
SFX 1644 Y 1
SFX 1644 0 уйся .
SFX 2900 Y 1
SFX 2900 0 ватая .
SFX 2322 Y 1
SFX 2322 0 анному .
SFX 485 Y 1
SFX 485 0 ниям .
SFX 775 Y 1
SFX 775 0 очку .
SFX 714 Y 1
SFX 714 0 щику .
SFX 1717 Y 1
SFX 1717 0 нина .
SFX 1774 Y 1
SFX 1774 0 нине .
SFX 1655 Y 1
SFX 1655 0 ованиями .
SFX 2802 Y 1
SFX 2802 0 руемся .
SFX 2950 Y 1
SFX 2950 0 нгу .
SFX 1541 Y 1
SFX 1541 0 альных .
SFX 1356 Y 1
SFX 1356 0 ичами .
SFX 1052 Y 1
SFX 1052 0 нными .
SFX 2147 Y 1
SFX 2147 0 яйте .
SFX 2562 Y 1
SFX 2562 0 олога .
SFX 2558 Y 1
SFX 2558 0 ологе .
SFX 2557 Y 1
SFX 2557 0 ологи .
SFX 2345 Y 1
SFX 2345 0 тельницу .
SFX 2344 Y 1
SFX 2344 0 тельницы .
SFX 2270 Y 1
SFX 2270 0 рному .
SFX 1419 Y 1
SFX 1419 0 нову .
SFX 1388 Y 1
SFX 1388 0 новы .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 0 вшего .
SFX 745 Y 1
SFX 745 0 инам .
SFX 1844 Y 1
SFX 1844 0 атов .
SFX 1416 Y 1
SFX 1416 0 атом .
SFX 1228 Y 1
SFX 1228 0 аньями .
SFX 2396 Y 1
SFX 2396 0 нского .
SFX 953 Y 1
SFX 953 0 шкам .
SFX 2184 Y 1
SFX 2184 0 чною .
SFX 2128 Y 1
SFX 2128 0 льницах .
SFX 1491 Y 1
SFX 1491 0 щицах .
SFX 1041 Y 1
SFX 1041 0 ческое .
SFX 1040 Y 1
SFX 1040 0 ческой .
SFX 1035 Y 1
SFX 1035 0 ческом .
SFX 2899 Y 1
SFX 2899 0 ватого .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 0 киным .
SFX 1272 Y 1
SFX 1272 0 ением .
SFX 348 Y 1
SFX 348 0 р .
SFX 654 Y 1
SFX 654 0 с .
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 0 т .
SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 0 у .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 х .
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 0 ц .
SFX 1299 Y 1
SFX 1299 0 ч .
SFX 755 Y 1
SFX 755 0 ш .
SFX 2041 Y 1
SFX 2041 0 щ .
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 0 ы .
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 0 ь .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 0 ю .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 я .
SFX 2160 Y 1
SFX 2160 0 оров .
SFX 2272 Y 1
SFX 2272 0 ором .
SFX 616 Y 1
SFX 616 0 ье .
SFX 2375 Y 1
SFX 2375 0 ьи .
SFX 380 Y 1
SFX 380 0 шаяся .
SFX 1078 Y 1
SFX 1078 0 нула .
SFX 1077 Y 1
SFX 1077 0 нули .
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 0 нуло .
SFX 1255 Y 1
SFX 1255 0 ющие .
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 ющий .
SFX 1254 Y 1
SFX 1254 0 ющим .
SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99 0 ка .
SFX 124 Y 1
SFX 124 0 ке .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 ки .
SFX 1698 Y 1
SFX 1698 0 ко .
SFX 2312 Y 1
SFX 2312 0 ельницей .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 0 шую .
SFX 1004 Y 1
SFX 1004 0 сами .
SFX 2470 Y 1
SFX 2470 0 авшеюся .
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 0 ках .
SFX 2599 Y 1
SFX 2599 0 каю .
SFX 1548 Y 1
SFX 1548 0 кая .
SFX 918 Y 1
SFX 918 0 ьных .
SFX 1609 Y 1
SFX 1609 0 ывались .
SFX 1859 Y 1
SFX 1859 0 ровать .
SFX 2370 Y 1
SFX 2370 0 ающейся .
SFX 2059 Y 1
SFX 2059 0 ушкам .
SFX 2805 Y 1
SFX 2805 0 ровалось .
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 шееся .
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 0 алось .
SFX 2598 Y 1
SFX 2598 0 кими .
SFX 2989 Y 1
SFX 2989 0 енькою .
SFX 1144 Y 1
SFX 1144 0 ающая .
SFX 2561 Y 1
SFX 2561 0 ологам .
SFX 558 Y 1
SFX 558 0 уешь .
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 0 ями .
SFX 578 Y 1
SFX 578 0 ующий .
SFX 1366 Y 1
SFX 1366 0 икою .
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 0 ниях .
SFX 1761 Y 1
SFX 1761 0 ничающий .
SFX 1727 Y 1
SFX 1727 0 нину .
SFX 1981 Y 1
SFX 1981 0 нины .
SFX 2116 Y 1
SFX 2116 0 лкой .
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 0 илась .
SFX 1980 Y 1
SFX 1980 0 хой .
SFX 2555 Y 1
SFX 2555 0 ологу .
SFX 744 Y 1
SFX 744 0 ируем .
SFX 572 Y 1
SFX 572 0 овала .
SFX 581 Y 1
SFX 581 0 овали .
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 0 овало .
SFX 2873 Y 1
SFX 2873 0 идный .
SFX 2229 Y 1
SFX 2229 0 явшие .
SFX 1795 Y 1
SFX 1795 0 явший .
SFX 2228 Y 1
SFX 2228 0 явшим .
SFX 2347 Y 1
SFX 2347 0 тельницей .
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 0 ностям .
SFX 1498 Y 1
SFX 1498 0 овскому .
SFX 969 Y 1
SFX 969 0 нувшими .
SFX 748 Y 1
SFX 748 0 инах .
SFX 2966 Y 1
SFX 2966 0 атор .
SFX 951 Y 1
SFX 951 0 шках .
SFX 375 Y 1
SFX 375 0 шиеся .
SFX 1025 Y 1
SFX 1025 0 чка .
SFX 1108 Y 1
SFX 1108 0 чке .
SFX 1080 Y 1
SFX 1080 0 чки .
SFX 2983 Y 1
SFX 2983 0 тельностей .
SFX 779 Y 1
SFX 779 0 льное .
SFX 778 Y 1
SFX 778 0 льной .
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 0 льном .
SFX 2456 Y 1
SFX 2456 0 ившимися .
SFX 1038 Y 1
SFX 1038 0 ческою .
SFX 2114 Y 1
SFX 2114 0 ологией .
SFX 1302 Y 1
SFX 1302 0 киных .
SFX 2111 Y 1
SFX 2111 0 ушек .
SFX 1780 Y 1
SFX 1780 0 истому .
SFX 1383 Y 1
SFX 1383 0 очные .
SFX 936 Y 1
SFX 936 0 очный .
SFX 1382 Y 1
SFX 1382 0 очным .
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 ными .
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 0 стей .
SFX 981 Y 1
SFX 981 0 шам .
SFX 1305 Y 1
SFX 1305 0 вое .
SFX 553 Y 1
SFX 553 0 вой .
SFX 2545 Y 1
SFX 2545 0 вок .
SFX 1006 Y 1
SFX 1006 0 вом .
SFX 473 Y 1
SFX 473 0 ью .
SFX 576 Y 1
SFX 576 0 ья .
SFX 1624 Y 1
SFX 1624 0 ивающийся .
SFX 443 Y 1
SFX 443 0 емый .
SFX 1252 Y 1
SFX 1252 0 ющих .
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 0 ку .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 0 ельницею .
SFX 1583 Y 1
SFX 1583 0 тельна .
SFX 1461 Y 1
SFX 1461 0 тельно .
SFX 1681 Y 1
SFX 1681 0 ывавшего .
SFX 2783 Y 1
SFX 2783 0 изируйтесь .
SFX 1983 Y 1
SFX 1983 0 изирующий .
SFX 2057 Y 1
SFX 2057 0 ушках .
SFX 1701 Y 1
SFX 1701 0 ивавшую .
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 0 ающийся .
SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 0 овыми .
SFX 2458 Y 1
SFX 2458 0 ившеюся .
SFX 2919 Y 1
SFX 2919 0 нностью .
SFX 2161 Y 1
SFX 2161 0 яют .
SFX 1533 Y 1
SFX 1533 0 онам .
SFX 2842 Y 1
SFX 2842 0 ета .
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 0 ете .
SFX 2559 Y 1
SFX 2559 0 ологах .
SFX 2530 Y 1
SFX 2530 0 вками .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 итесь .
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 0 вавшие .
SFX 299 Y 1
SFX 299 0 вавший .
SFX 457 Y 1
SFX 457 0 вавшим .
SFX 1968 Y 1
SFX 1968 0 изировала .
SFX 1967 Y 1
SFX 1967 0 изировали .
SFX 1966 Y 1
SFX 1966 0 изировало .
SFX 902 Y 1
SFX 902 0 вшихся .
SFX 2132 Y 1
SFX 2132 0 лкою .
SFX 2841 Y 1
SFX 2841 0 изирующийся .
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 0 авшее .
SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 0 авшей .
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 0 авшем .
SFX 2654 Y 1
SFX 2654 0 ированные .
SFX 1120 Y 1
SFX 1120 0 ированный .
SFX 2653 Y 1
SFX 2653 0 ированным .
SFX 669 Y 1
SFX 669 0 лей .
SFX 956 Y 1
SFX 956 0 лем .
SFX 696 Y 1
SFX 696 0 лен .
SFX 2019 Y 1
SFX 2019 0 хою .
SFX 1748 Y 1
SFX 1748 0 ничаете .
SFX 2117 Y 1
SFX 2117 0 чами .
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 0 тикам .
SFX 941 Y 1
SFX 941 0 ированиями .
SFX 743 Y 1
SFX 743 0 ирует .
SFX 2650 Y 1
SFX 2650 0 торам .
SFX 2226 Y 1
SFX 2226 0 явших .
SFX 1221 Y 1
SFX 1221 0 ствовала .
SFX 1220 Y 1
SFX 1220 0 ствовали .
SFX 1219 Y 1
SFX 1219 0 ствовало .
SFX 2346 Y 1
SFX 2346 0 тельницею .
SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 0 ностях .
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 0 авшись .
SFX 1044 Y 1
SFX 1044 0 ческими .
SFX 1107 Y 1
SFX 1107 0 чку .
SFX 777 Y 1
SFX 777 0 льною .
SFX 2284 Y 1
SFX 2284 0 аемую .
SFX 2113 Y 1
SFX 2113 0 ологиею .
SFX 1321 Y 1
SFX 1321 0 ываем .
SFX 1075 Y 1
SFX 1075 0 уемый .
SFX 134 Y 1
SFX 134 0 ые .
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 0 ый .
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 0 ым .
SFX 1238 Y 1
SFX 1238 0 ствующий .
SFX 1380 Y 1
SFX 1380 0 очных .
SFX 2626 Y 1
SFX 2626 0 тную .
SFX 962 Y 1
SFX 962 0 шах .
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 0 шая .
SFX 1072 Y 1
SFX 1072 0 вою .
SFX 2119 Y 1
SFX 2119 0 ологиями .
SFX 1582 Y 1
SFX 1582 0 тельны .
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 0 имый .
SFX 2878 Y 1
SFX 2878 0 рскому .
SFX 2007 Y 1
SFX 2007 0 евшее .
SFX 2006 Y 1
SFX 2006 0 евшей .
SFX 2005 Y 1
SFX 2005 0 евшем .
SFX 534 Y 1
SFX 534 0 вавшись .
SFX 1873 Y 1
SFX 1873 0 руем .
SFX 1683 Y 1
SFX 1683 0 нутся .
SFX 1100 Y 1
SFX 1100 0 ировались .
SFX 712 Y 1
SFX 712 0 чикам .
SFX 2400 Y 1
SFX 2400 0 нские .
SFX 1878 Y 1
SFX 1878 0 нский .
SFX 2399 Y 1
SFX 2399 0 нским .
SFX 1790 Y 1
SFX 1790 0 яла .
SFX 1757 Y 1
SFX 1757 0 яли .
SFX 1794 Y 1
SFX 1794 0 яло .
SFX 650 Y 1
SFX 650 0 нув .
SFX 957 Y 1
SFX 957 0 нул .
SFX 1530 Y 1
SFX 1530 0 онах .
SFX 1389 Y 1
SFX 1389 0 еть .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 0 вавших .
SFX 596 Y 1
SFX 596 0 ваясь .
SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 0 авшею .
SFX 2668 Y 1
SFX 2668 0 яйся .
SFX 2651 Y 1
SFX 2651 0 ированных .
SFX 1792 Y 1
SFX 1792 0 лите .
SFX 595 Y 1
SFX 595 0 ницам .
SFX 971 Y 1
SFX 971 0 нувшие .
SFX 674 Y 1
SFX 674 0 нувший .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 нувшим .
SFX 2854 Y 1
SFX 2854 0 тиках .
SFX 139 Y 1
SFX 139 0 лась .
SFX 2025 Y 1
SFX 2025 0 изируемый .
SFX 1663 Y 1
SFX 1663 0 нёте .
SFX 2621 Y 1
SFX 2621 0 торах .
SFX 1937 Y 1
SFX 1937 0 льности .
SFX 1593 Y 1
SFX 1593 0 аемте .
SFX 1258 Y 1
SFX 1258 0 ющего .
SFX 1320 Y 1
SFX 1320 0 ывает .
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 0 ров .
SFX 1694 Y 1
SFX 1694 0 рой .
SFX 2740 Y 1
SFX 2740 0 рок .
SFX 615 Y 1
SFX 615 0 ром .
SFX 2091 Y 1
SFX 2091 0 оза .
SFX 2122 Y 1
SFX 2122 0 озе .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 ых .
SFX 24 Y 1
SFX 24 0 тесь .
SFX 1319 Y 1
SFX 1319 0 ываете .
SFX 2084 Y 1
SFX 2084 0 ичными .
SFX 1625 Y 1
SFX 1625 0 иваются .
SFX 2760 Y 1
SFX 2760 0 ткой .
SFX 2661 Y 1
SFX 2661 0 ированного .
SFX 618 Y 1
SFX 618 0 имтесь .
SFX 1176 Y 1
SFX 1176 0 телей .
SFX 1195 Y 1
SFX 1195 0 телем .
SFX 1589 Y 1
SFX 1589 0 телен .
SFX 1845 Y 1
SFX 1845 0 тка .
SFX 2214 Y 1
SFX 2214 0 тке .
SFX 1996 Y 1
SFX 1996 0 тки .
SFX 2644 Y 1
SFX 2644 0 чевой .
SFX 1291 Y 1
SFX 1291 0 ата .
SFX 1817 Y 1
SFX 1817 0 ате .
SFX 417 Y 1
SFX 417 0 ическими .
SFX 2003 Y 1
SFX 2003 0 евшею .
SFX 2014 Y 1
SFX 2014 0 овичам .
SFX 1712 Y 1
SFX 1712 0 ивавшая .
SFX 1872 Y 1
SFX 1872 0 рует .
SFX 2115 Y 1
SFX 2115 0 ниной .
SFX 2468 Y 1
SFX 2468 0 авшимися .
SFX 2898 Y 1
SFX 2898 0 ватое .
SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 0 ватой .
SFX 2752 Y 1
SFX 2752 0 ватом .
SFX 710 Y 1
SFX 710 0 чиках .
SFX 2397 Y 1
SFX 2397 0 нских .
SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 0 авшему .
SFX 2965 Y 1
SFX 2965 0 нила .
SFX 2994 Y 1
SFX 2994 0 нило .
SFX 629 Y 1
SFX 629 0 нут .
SFX 92 Y 1
SFX 92 0 ную .
SFX 1430 Y 1
SFX 1430 0 ельного .
SFX 1011 Y 1
SFX 1011 0 овавшие .
SFX 582 Y 1
SFX 582 0 овавший .
SFX 1010 Y 1
SFX 1010 0 овавшим .
SFX 1401 Y 1
SFX 1401 0 очному .
SFX 2709 Y 1
SFX 2709 0 ющемуся .
SFX 1825 Y 1
SFX 1825 0 ицам .
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 0 щее .
SFX 197 Y 1
SFX 197 0 щей .
SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 0 щем .
SFX 2164 Y 1
SFX 2164 0 яешь .
SFX 2000 Y 1
SFX 2000 0 евшими .
SFX 1203 Y 1
SFX 1203 0 иваете .
